New York, session 2025-2026, A8517.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The labor law is amended by adding a new section 870-p to 2 read as follows: 3 § 870-p. Control of operation of amusement devices. Any amusement 4 device, including temporary devices, may be operated by a trained opera- 5 tor at least sixteen years of age. Every operator shall be trained in 6 the use and function of all normal and emergency operating controls and 7 in the proper use of the amusement device. A trained operator shall be 8 in the immediate vicinity of the main control panel during operation of 9 the amusement device and no other person shall be permitted to handle 10 such controls during normal operation. No operator shall be responsible 11 for the operation of more than one amusement device at a time. Provided, 12 however, that this section shall not apply to amusement devices designed 13 to be operated or controlled safely by a passenger. The provisions of 14 this section shall supersede any law, rule, or regulation in conflict 15 therewith, including, but not limited to, 12 NY CRR § 45-2.8. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11319-01-5